Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5351.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 9227. (1) The Subject to this section, the department shall promulgate rules to implement this part, including, but not limited to, rules governing all of the following: (a) Age periods for immunizations. (b) The minimum ages at which immunization may be commenced. (c) The minimum number of doses required during a specified time period. (d) Minimum levels of immunization for children in school. (e) Reporting under section 9206(3). (f) The acquisition, maintenance, and dissemination of information contained in the registry. established under section 9207. (2) The department shall promulgate rules to implement the expansion of the registry to include the reporting and recording of additional information such as lead screening performed on children. (3) In promulgating rules under this section on immunizations, the department shall do all of the following: (a) Consider the recommendations of the advisory committee on immunization practices of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, the American Academy of Pediatrics, the American Academy of Family Physicians, the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists, and the American College of Physicians. (b) If the recommendations of 2 or more of the entities described in subdivision (a) conflict, consult with the Michigan advisory committee on immunizations. (c) If, after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subsection, the recommendations of the advisory committee on immunization practices of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention are repealed, modified, or otherwise no longer in effect, maintain, at a minimum, the requirements for immunizations as prescribed by rules in effect on January 1, 2025. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S04997'25) or House Bill No. 5353 (request no. H04997'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.